Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1151.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Adjacent Neighbors' Bill of Rights Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Developer." An entity undertaking the creation of real property in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Powers and duties of department.123456789101112131415 (a) Compilation and notice.--The department shall compile a list of the rights and available resources and do all of the following:(1) Develop a pamphlet to be known as the "Adjacent Neighbors' Bill of Rights" advising homeowners who are adjacent to a property under development or construction of their rights and available resources in plain language and post the pamphlet on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Ensure that developers mail a copy of the pamphlet to all homeowners who are adjacent to any property being developed. The pamphlet must be mailed when the developer applies for a permit for the development or construction.(3) Ensure that copies of the pamphlet are provided to all State and local elected officials, community boards and any other organizations deemed necessary by the department.(b) Contents of notice.--The pamphlet developed under this section shall include the following, written in plain language, and any other information added at the discretion of the department, not inconsistent with the following:(1) The rights and remedies provided to homeowners in this Commonwealth.(2) Guidelines for identifying and contacting competent attorneys or structural engineers to represent an adjacent homeowner before developers and the developer's representatives and the services the attorneys or engineers should provide to the homeowner.(3) An advisory on the availability of homeowners' rights at the department to review plans submitted by developers and further advise homeowners of their rights.20250HB1151PN1271 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) An advisory of a homeowner's right to an engineering survey, at the developer's expense, when a developer plans to perform underpinning or excavation or encroachments on a homeowner's property.(5) An advisory stating the following:(i) A developer is required to gain a homeowner's permission to access the homeowner's property.(ii) A negotiated access license agreement or other agreement is required to specify the developer's responsibilities, duration and scope of activities on the homeowner's property.(6) An advisory on when a developer is required to negotiate a license or party wall agreement with the homeowner and that a homeowner should seek representation from a construction attorney.(7) An advisory of a homeowner's right to compel a developer through a party wall or license agreement, including excavation or underpinning, to take protective measures involving the party wall, including the installation of crack gauges and vibration monitors.(8) An advisory that a homeowner may contact the municipality to inquire about municipal noise ordinances or appropriate development or construction hours. The advisory shall include a list of municipality-approved development or construction hours.(9) An advisory of a developer's obligations under State law, rules or regulations to a homeowner for any damages to a homeowner's property due to a developer's excavation or underpinning.(10) Contact information and other resources within the 20250HB1151PN1271 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department related to excavation and underpinning and development plans and permits available to homeowners.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1151PN1271 - 4 - 1234